Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 4 Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
24-4-742. Credit for service with various local units of government.

Any full-time employee of a public facilities board, rural waterworks facilities board, regional solid waste management board, joint county and municipal sanitation authority, regional water distribution board, public rehabilitation services corporation, or other local unit of government enrolled in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System pursuant to this act who is a full-time employee of a participating public facilities board, regional solid waste management board, joint county and municipal sanitation authority, regional water distribution board, public rehabilitation services corporation, or other local unit of government in this state on the date his or her employer became, or becomes, a public employer in the system may apply for and receive current service credit for service rendered as a full-time employee of the public facilities board, regional solid waste management board, joint county and municipal sanitation authority, regional water distribution board, public rehabilitation services corporation, or other local unit of government.

The employee shall receive credit only if the employee or employer pays or causes to be paid to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund all necessary employee contributions at the rate and on the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, all employer contributions based on the employer normal cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, and regular interest on the employee and employer contributions computed from the date the service was rendered to the date the payment is received by the system.

The employer's contributions and employees' contributions, if applicable, shall be transmitted to the system in the form and manner, together with the supporting data, as the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall prescribe from time to time.

The governing body of any public facilities board, rural waterworks facilities board, regional solid waste management board, joint county and municipal sanitation authority, regional water distribution board, public rehabilitation services corporation, or other local unit of government electing to include the full-time employees of the board within the membership of the system may pay the employer contributions and employee contributions, if applicable, on behalf of employees for services rendered.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 398, § 5; 1995, No. 1292, § 5; 1997, No. 299, § 23; 2001, No. 151, § 46.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1995, Nos. 398 and 1292, codified as §§ 24-4-101, 24-4-202, 24-4-742.

24-4-743. Intergovernmental Juvenile Detention Council employees.

Any full-time employee of the Intergovernmental Juvenile Detention Council of the Tenth Judicial District enrolled in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System pursuant to this section who is a full-time employee of the council on the date his or her employer becomes a public employer in the system, may apply for and receive current service credit for service rendered as a full-time employee of the council.

The employee shall receive credit only if the employee or employer pays, or causes to be paid, to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund all necessary employer contributions and employee contributions, if applicable, that would have been paid had the employee been a member of the system during that time, plus interest thereon at the rate directed by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The employer's contributions and employees' contributions, if applicable, shall be transmitted to the system in the form and manner, together with the supporting data, as the board shall prescribe from time to time.

The council electing to include the full-time employees of the board within the membership of the system may pay the employer contributions and employee contributions, if applicable, on behalf of employees for services rendered.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 76, § 6.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-4-101 — 24-4-202, 24-4-205 — 24-4-304, 24-4-401 — 24-4-501, 24-4-507, 24-4-508, 24-4-510 — 24-4-514, 24-4-516 — 24-4-603, 24-4-605 — 24-4-619, 24-4-704 — 24-4-707, 24-4-710, 24-4-712, 24-4-714, 24-4-723, 24-4-724, 24-4-726, 24-4-727, 24-4-729, 24-4-732, 24-4-733, 24-4-737, 24-4-739 — 24-4-742, and 24-4-745 — 24-4-747 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-4-744. Elected county official.

For the purpose of determining benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, a member of the system who has service as an elected county official for a period during which the office was under the fee system, the salary of the member during that period shall be deemed to be the average salary for county officials in the same office in this state on July 1, 1997.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 299, § 27.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-4-101 — 24-4-202, 24-4-205 — 24-4-304, 24-4-401 — 24-4-501, 24-4-507, 24-4-508, 24-4-510 — 24-4-514, 24-4-516 — 24-4-603, 24-4-605 — 24-4-619, 24-4-704 — 24-4-707, 24-4-710, 24-4-712, 24-4-714, 24-4-723, 24-4-724, 24-4-726, 24-4-727, 24-4-729, 24-4-732, 24-4-733, 24-4-737, 24-4-739 — 24-4-742, and 24-4-745 — 24-4-747 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-4-745. General Assembly employees.

An employee of the General Assembly who has at least five (5) years' service in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and who served at least four hundred (400) days as a session employee of the General Assembly may apply for and receive current service credit in the system for service rendered as a session employee.

The employee shall receive credit only if the employee or employer pays or causes to be paid to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund:

All necessary employee contributions at the rate and on the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time;

All employer contributions based on the employer normal cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time; and

Regular interest on the employee and employer contributions computed from the date the service was rendered to the date the payment is received by the system.

The employer's contributions and employees' contributions, if applicable, shall be transmitted to the system in the form and manner, together with the supporting data, as the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall prescribe from time to time.

The employer may pay the employer contributions and employee contributions, if applicable, on behalf of the employee for services rendered.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 325, § 12.

24-4-746. Authority to promulgate rules.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall have the authority to promulgate such rules as are necessary to provide for the participation of employers defined as public rehabilitative services corporations or other local units of government under the provisions of § 4-34-101 and such local units of government as are provided for under this Code. Provided, however, the board shall not admit or retain any employer whose participation in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System would jeopardize the tax-qualified status of the plan under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., or that would subject the plan to additional federal requirements, or to any other consequence that the board would determine to be detrimental to the system.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 865, § 2; 2001, No. 151, § 47; 2019, No. 315, § 2862.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the first sentence.

24-4-747. Erroneous membership of certain employees.

A person who was erroneously included in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for at least two (2) years and whose disqualification from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System was due to employment that caused the person to be a member of another state-supported or state-authorized retirement system may elect to restore service credit lost as a result of the erroneous dual coverage if:

The person is a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System at the time of applying to restore the lost credited service;

The person applies to restore the lost service credit within two (2) years after the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System refunded contributions; and

Any contributions and interest that were refunded by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System are repaid, along with any interest accruing from the date of the refunding until the funds are actually repaid to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

A person who elects to restore credited service under this section shall not be entitled to receive credited service in the other state-supported retirement system for the same period. The other system shall refund contributions paid for the period plus reasonable interest on the contributions at the rate determined by the board of trustees of the other system.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1010, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1999, No. 1010, § 2, provided:

“This act shall apply retroactively to allow the restoration of service credit lost prior to July 30, 1999.”

24-4-748. Dual full-time employment.

A person who was included in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for service at full-time employment while at the same time employed full time in another position covered under a municipal police pension and relief fund and whose disqualification from the system was due to dual coverage as a member of a municipal police pension and relief fund may receive service credit as a result of the dual coverage if:

After the initial full-time employment when service credit was lost, the person again becomes a member of the system;

The person applies to receive the lost service credit within five (5) years after the reemployment under the system; and

The member pays or causes to be paid:

The employee contributions at the rate of compensation that would have been paid as a system member during that time;

Employer contributions based on the normal employer cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had the person been a member during that time; and

Regular interest on the employee and employer contributions.

Interest shall be computed from the date the service was rendered to the date the payment is received by the system.

The member may purchase all of the service or any portion thereof in multiples of one (1) year.

A person who elects to restore credited service under this section shall be limited to receiving credited service in the system for up to five (5) years of the initial dual full-time employment.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary forms for application to restore the service and reasonable rules to implement this section.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1614, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2863.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c).

24-4-749. Purchase of out-of-state governmental service.

A member who has performed service other than military service as an employee of a state or local governmental entity in the United States other than in the State of Arkansas or the federal government may receive credited service for the out-of-state governmental employment if:

The member has at least five (5) years of credited service at the time of application;

The number of years of out-of-state governmental employment applied for does not exceed five (5) years;

At the time of application the member furnishes evidence of the out-of-state service that is acceptable to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; and

The member pays to the member's deposit fund an amount equal to the actuarial present value of the credited service applied for under this section based upon assumptions recommended by the actuary.

A member may not receive the credited service provided for in this section if the service is also used for the purpose of establishing entitlement to, or the amount of, any other benefit to be paid by any federal, state, or local government entity except a benefit under the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

The service credit provided for in this section is subject to any applicable limits under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1021, § 1; 2007, No. 1570, § 1; 2013, No. 332, § 11.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted the subdivision designations in (a)(1) and deleted (a)(1)(B).

24-4-750. Arkansas District Judge Retirement System abolished — Powers, duties, and plan liabilities transferred to Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The Arkansas District Judge Retirement System, established by § 24-8-801 et seq. [repealed], is abolished, and its powers, duties, and plan liabilities are transferred to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System by a type 3 transfer as prescribed in § 25-2-106.

For purposes of this act, the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall maintain the same process of payments under § 24-4-751.

Active members of the Arkansas District Judge Retirement System on the date of the transfer shall continue to accrue the same program of benefits received before the transfer.

As employer, the government entity that pays the salary of a district judge shall make contributions to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as a percent of the salary of the active district judge at the rate previously established to fund the district judge benefit program unless the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System's actuary determines that a different required contribution rate should be applied.

Each district judge joining the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System after the date of transfer shall be deemed an elected official of a city or county and shall receive service credit under § 24-4-101(15)(B).

History.

Acts 2007, No. 177, § 1.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 2007, No. 177, codified as §§ 16-10-307, 16-10-308, 16-17-135, 19-4-1107, 24-2-401, 24-2-402, 24-2-502, 24-4-750, 24-4-751, 24-8-318, 24-8-807, 24-8-902, and 24-8-904.

24-4-751. Additional funding for retirement benefits.

The government entity that had previously established a local municipal judge's retirement fund shall be required to contribute an amount of money that represents the actuarially determined accrued liability for those judges and former judges who were covered by the local fund on December 31, 2004.

The assets in the local municipal judge retirement fund, not to exceed the amount in subsection (a) of this section, shall be paid to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System on January 1, 2008.

If the local municipal judge retirement fund does not have sufficient money available to pay the amount determined in subsection (a) of this section to the system on January 1, 2008, then the remaining amount of actuarially determined accrued liability shall be paid on or before December 31 each year after for up to the next thirty (30) years based on a thirty-year amortization period.

If the amount in the municipal judge retirement fund is greater than the actuarially determined amount of the liabilities to be transferred to the system, that excess may be retained by the sponsoring government entity for the sole purpose of paying the retirement benefits of district judges.

If at any time in the future an obligation to fund the system no longer exists, then any excess shall be retained by the sponsoring government entity.

The accrued benefit used to determine the accrued liability under this section shall be determined by:

Calculating the benefit that the judge would be eligible to receive on December 31, 2004, as provided by law before July 16, 2003, if the judge was eligible to begin receiving benefits on January 1, 2005; and

Multiplying the amount in subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this section by the number of years of eligible service and then dividing by the greater of either the number of years of service needed to be eligible to retire or the current years of eligible service.

The service years shall be determined under the law before January 1, 2005.

The accrued benefit determined under subsection (e) of this section for any retiree or surviving spouse who is receiving benefits on December 31, 2004, shall be the amount that he or she is receiving or entitled to receive on that date.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 177, § 10.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Regarding references to municipal court judges, see note at § 24-4-724.

24-4-752. State Police Trust Fund.

All assets of the State Police Retirement System are transferred to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to hold in trust for the State Police Retirement System.

There is created under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System a division that shall be known as the “State Police Trust Fund”.

The State Police Trust Fund shall not be treated as segregated funds but shall be commingled with the assets of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System strictly for investment purposes.

The assets shall be managed solely for the benefit of the retirees and beneficiaries of the State Police Retirement System and shall not be divested from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System unless it can clearly be demonstrated it would be actuarially and fiscally prudent to do so.

As employer, the Department of Arkansas State Police shall make contributions to the State Police Trust Fund based on a percentage of each active state police officer's salary at the rate established to fund the State Police Retirement System's benefit program before July 1, 2009.

All other sources of revenue commonly accruing to the State Police Retirement System shall be payable to the State Police Trust Fund.

The Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System, and administrative staff shall be immune from any suit or action based in whole or in part on the transfer of assets contemplated by this act.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, § 1, provided: “Legislative history, findings, and intent.

“(a) It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Department of Arkansas State Police has had ongoing financial difficulty for over twelve (12) years. The State Police Retirement System has sustained investment losses of approximately one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) within the last two (2) years, and so needs a larger investment pool to help reduce risk and enhance returns. The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System has the size and expertise to effectively reduce the volatility of returns, enhance relative returns, and best protect the State Police Retirement System.

“(b) This act represents a negotiated alternative to a proposal that would have eliminated the State Police Retirement System and would have made it a division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

“(c) This act maintains the autonomy over State Police Retirement System benefits but ensures funds are invested in a larger, more diversified pool of assets.

“(d) It is contemplated that at such time as the State Police Retirement System attains a funding level in which assets are eighty percent (80%) or more of actuarially accrued liabilities, the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System may consider certain enhancements to the Tier II Deferred Retirement Option Plan.”

Meaning of "this act".

Acts 2009, No. 1242, codified as §§ 24-4-752, 24-6-204, and § 24-6-501 et seq.

Subchapter 8
— Deferred Retirement Option Plan

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 1052, § 10: Apr. 2, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the retention of experienced public employees for state government and for county and municipal governments are beneficial to the administration of government in Arkansas and with the increased longevity of people in general, public employees are capable of working longer and qualified and experienced employees are reaching retirement eligibility earlier in their careers. Immediate passage of the act is essential to the efficient administration of government in Arkansas and immediate implementation of the provisions of this act is necessary to maintain experienced public employees in the ranks of state and local government. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 535, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the exact percentage of the DROP contribution for the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System should be specified in the law and for the effective administration of the System in this act must be effective at the beginning of the fiscal year because computations are made at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1325, § 14: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 311 of 1999 changes the amount of additional monthly benefits in the State Highway Employees' Retirement System and they are necessary for the continued financial stability of the current retirees, that clarifications are needed in order to make Act 311 take effect in an orderly fashion, that these changes in Act 311 must then take effect at the same time Act 311 becomes effective, and that it is necessary to implement the changes in benefits at the beginning of the current fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act, except for Sections 2 and 3, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 762, § 3: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System this act should become effective on July 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2011, No. 38, § 11: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the public retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 558, § 3: Jan. 1, 2012.

Acts 2017, No. 502, § 2: Mar. 15, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System are complex; that the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of § 24-4-101 et seq. are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring the operations of the system into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this act will enable members of the system to obtain benefits in a more time efficient manner; and that this act is immediately necessary because it will allow the system to align its standard of practice with the provisions of the act and thereafter expediently address the needs of its members. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2017, No. 552, § 2: Jan. 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, No. 448, § 13: Mar. 13, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the system are in imminent need of revision; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 624, § 2: Apr. 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that Acts 2019, No. 448, which was immediately effective, contained an error that is in imminent need of revision; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-4-801. Participation.

In lieu of terminating employment and accepting a retirement benefit under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System pursuant to § 24-2-201 et seq. and § 24-4-101 et seq., any person who is a member of the system and who meets the conditions specified in subsection (b) of this section may elect to participate in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Deferred Retirement Option Plan and to defer the receipt of retirement benefits in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.

The conditions required for full participation in the plan are that the member must have at least thirty (30) years of actual service in the system.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, in consultation with its actuary, may promulgate rules lowering the required years of service for entry into the plan to an amount of not less than twenty-eight (28) years of service, subject to an early participation reduction. The reduction will be computed in a manner that is both equitable to all members and actuarially appropriate for the system.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1052, § 1; 1999, No. 1325, § 2; 2001, No. 151, § 48; 2019, No. 315, § 2864.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c).

24-4-802. Eligibility — Effect of election.

When a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System elects participation in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Deferred Retirement Option Plan, the member shall fill out an application form as developed by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System. The member's application shall be reviewed to determine whether or not the member meets the eligibility requirements specified in this subchapter. The member's deferred retirement option date shall be the later of:

The first day of the month following the system's determination that the member is eligible for plan participation; or

The date requested by the member on the application.

A member who elects participation in the plan may elect one (1) of the annuity options provided in § 24-4-606.

The election shall be deemed to apply to the member's deferred retirement option plan benefit as well as to the member's monthly retirement benefit from the system at the time it becomes payable.

The election to participate in the plan is irrevocable and the duration of participation in the plan for active members shall not exceed seven (7) years.

Under no circumstances shall a member receive service credit under any state-supported retirement system during a period of participation or following a period of such participation in the same retirement system's plan.

When a member begins participation in the plan, the:

Employee contributions to the system on behalf of the member shall cease; and

Employer contributions to the system on behalf of the member shall continue.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1052, § 2; 2001, No. 151, § 49; 2001, No. 762, § 1; 2007, No. 176, § 6; 2011, No. 558, § 2; 2017, No. 502, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment rewrote (d).

The 2017 amendment deleted “second” preceding “month” in (a)(1).

24-4-803. Amount of benefit — Amount of contribution — Interest.

The member's deferred benefit shall be the monthly benefit to which the member would have been entitled if the member had thirty (30) years of service and had actually retired on the member's deferred retirement option date with regard to the provisions of § 24-4-606 related to annuity options.

If the member has less than thirty (30) years of actual service, but at least twenty-eight (28) years of service, the portion of the member's deferred benefit that is contributed to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Deferred Retirement Option Plan will be reduced by the percentage established by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, and then shall be subject to the additional computations as set forth in subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

The member's deferred option account shall be the account in which shall be accumulated the member's deferred option contributions, plus interest. Effective July 1, 1999, the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System's deferred option contributions shall be at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the system's deferred option benefit with the exact contribution to be determined in accordance with the rules of the board as is actuarially appropriate for the system. The member shall be informed of the amount of his or her deferred option contribution and informed that his or her selection of the deferred retirement option, the time of the retirement deferral, and the selection of the retirement annuity are irrevocable.

The interest on contributions to the member's deferred option account shall be credited to the individual account balance of the member on an annual basis at the end of each fiscal year. The board shall determine the rate of interest to be credited to each member's deferred option account.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1052, § 3; 1999, No. 535, § 1; 1999, No. 1325, § 3; 2001, No. 151, § 50;
2019, No. 315, § 2865.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).